New York, session 2025-2026, S6157.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 8 of section 402 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law, as amended by section 3 of subpart A of part WW of 3 chapter 56 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) A violation of subparagraph (ii), subparagraph (ii-a) or subpara- 5 graph (iii) of paragraph (b) of subdivision one of this section shall be 6 punishable by a [fine of not less than one hundred nor more than five 7 hundred dollars] schedule of fines as follows: (i) one hundred fifty 8 dollars for the first violation, (ii) three hundred dollars for a second 9 violation, (iii) five hundred dollars for a third violation, (iv) eight 10 hundred dollars for a fourth violation, and (v) one thousand dollars for 11 a fifth and any subsequent violations committed within a period of eigh- 12 teen months. 13 § 2. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new section 14 224-b to read as follows: 15 § 224-b. Statewide multi-agency integrated data system on number plate 16 violations, motor vehicle registration status, and traffic violations by 17 individuals. 18 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have 19 the following meanings: 20 (a) "Number plate violation" shall mean the obscuring, concealing, or 21 otherwise obstructing of a license plate as defined in section four 22 hundred two of this chapter. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10739-01-5 S. 6157 2 1 (b) "Motor vehicle registration" shall mean the application for, issu- 2 ance of, and validity of a certificate of registration for motor vehicle 3 operation as set forth in section four hundred one of this chapter. 4 (c) "Traffic violation" shall mean any moving and non-moving traffic 5 offense prohibited in state law or local ordinance relating to the oper- 6 ation of a motor vehicle. 7 (d) "Local law enforcement authority" shall mean any county, city, 8 town, or village entity empowered to issue fines or tickets related to 9 moving and non-moving traffic offenses. 10 2. The commissioner shall establish and maintain a searchable database 11 containing information regarding the motor vehicle registration, prior 12 number plate violations, and prior traffic violations of persons operat- 13 ing motor vehicles throughout the state. This database shall be sourced 14 with data from the department, local law enforcement authorities, the 15 park, parkway and highway authorities as described in article two of the 16 public authorities law; the bridge and tunnel authorities as described 17 in article three of the public authorities law; the port authorities as 18 described in article six of the public authorities law; and the parking 19 authorities as described in article seven of the public authorities law. 20 Such searchable database shall include, though not be limited to, the 21 following data, features, and functionality to the extent practicable: 22 (a) violations of subdivision eight of section four hundred two of 23 this chapter; 24 (b) license suspensions related to violations of subdivision four-h of 25 section five hundred ten of this chapter; 26 (c) violations of section twelve hundred of this chapter; 27 (d) violations of toll collection regulations outlined in section 28 twenty-nine hundred eighty-five of the public authorities law; 29 (e) accessibility of the database by state and local entities defined 30 in this section, including their authorized officers and personnel; 31 (f) capability for immediate data retrieval in response to queries; 32 (g) a definition or description of terms for fields in the database; 33 (h) the ability to digitally select defined individual fields corre- 34 sponding to any of the reported information from qualified agencies or 35 local entities to create unique database views; and 36 (i) a guide outlining the features and functionality of the database 37 for users. 38 3. The database required by this section shall be utilized in the 39 issuance of fines, tickets, or notices of liability related to moving 40 and non-moving traffic offenses by the department, local law enforcement 41 authorities, the park, parkway and highway authorities as described in 42 article two of the public authorities law; the bridge and tunnel author- 43 ities as described in article three of the public authorities law; the 44 port authorities as described in article six of the public authorities 45 law; and the parking authorities as described in article seven of the 46 public authorities law. 47 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 48 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 49 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 50 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 51 completed on or before such effective date.